Utah statutes.
7-1-810.   Limited liability companies.
(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this title and subject to
Subsection (8), if the conditions of this section are met, the following may
be organized as or convert to a limited liability company under Title 48,
Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act:
(a)  an industrial bank chartered under Chapter 8, Industrial Banks;
(b)  an industrial loan company as defined in Section 7-8-21; or
(c)  any of the following if the institution is an S Corporation, as defined
in Section 1361, Internal Revenue Code, immediately before becoming a limited
liability company:
(i)  a bank chartered under Chapter 3, Banks;
(ii)  a savings and loan association chartered under Chapter 7, Savings and
Loan Associations Act; or
(iii)  a depository institution holding company.
(2) (a)  Before an institution described in Subsection (1) may organize as or
convert to a limited liability company, the institution shall obtain approval
of the commissioner.
(b) (i)  To obtain the approval under this section from the commissioner, the
institution shall file a request for approval with the commissioner at least
30 days before the day on which the institution becomes a limited liability
company.
(ii)  If the commissioner does not disapprove the request for approval within
30 days from the day on which the commissioner receives the request, the
request is considered approved.
(iii)  When taking action on a request for approval filed under this section,
the commissioner may:
(A)  approve the request;
(B)  approve the request subject to terms and conditions the commissioner
considers necessary; or
(C)  disapprove the request.
(3)  To approve a request for approval, the commissioner shall find:
(a)  for an institution described in Subsection (1) that is required to be
insured by a federal deposit insurance agency, that the institution:
(i)  will operate in a safe and sound manner;
(ii)  has the following characteristics:
(A)  the institution is not subject to automatic termination, dissolution, or
suspension upon the happening of some event other than the passage of time;
(B)  the exclusive authority to manage the institution is vested in a board of
managers or directors that:
(I)  is elected or appointed by the owners;
(II)  is not required to have owners of the institution included on the board;
(III)  possesses adequate independence and authority to supervise the
operation of the institution; and
(IV)  operates with substantially the same rights, powers, privileges, duties,
and responsibilities as the board of directors of a corporation;
(C)  neither state law, nor the institution's operating agreement, bylaws, or
other organizational documents provide that an owner of the institution is
liable for the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the institution in
excess of the amount of the owner's investment; and
(D) (I)  neither state law, nor the institution's operating agreement, bylaws,
or other organizational documents require the consent of any other owner of
the institution in order for any owner to transfer an ownership interest in
the institution, including voting rights; and
(II)  the institution is able to obtain new investment funding if needed to
maintain adequate capital; and
(iii)  is able to comply with all legal and regulatory requirements for an
insured depository institution under applicable federal and state law; and
(b)  for an institution described in Subsection (1) that is not required to be
insured by a federal deposit insurance agency, that the institution will
operate in a safe and sound manner.
(4)  An institution described in Subsection (3)(a) that is organized as a
limited liability company shall maintain the characteristics listed in
Subsection (3)(a)(ii) during such time as it is authorized to conduct business
under this title as a limited liability company.
(5) (a)  All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of an
institution described in Subsection (1) that is organized as a limited
liability company and its members and managers shall be governed by Title 48,
Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act, except:
(i)  the following sections do not apply to an institution that is described
in Subsection (3)(a):
(A)  Subsection 48-2c-402(2)(a)(ii);
(B)  Section 48-2c-604;
(C)  Section 48-2c-703;
(D)  Section 48-2c-708;
(E)  Subsection 48-2c-801(2);
(F)  Section 48-2c-1102;
(G)  Section 48-2c-1104; and
(H)  Subsections 48-2c-1201(2) through (5); and
(ii)  as otherwise provided in this title.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), for an institution that is described
in Subsection (3)(a):
(i)  for purposes of transferring a member's interests in the institution, a
member's interest in the institution shall be treated like a share of stock in
a corporation; and
(ii)  if a member's interest in the institution is transferred voluntarily or
involuntarily to another person, the person who receives the member's interest
shall obtain the member's entire rights associated with the member's interest
in the institution including:
(A)  all economic rights; and
(B)  all voting rights.
(c)  An institution described in Subsection (3)(a) may not by agreement or
otherwise change the application of Subsection (5)(a) to the institution.
(6)  Unless the context requires otherwise, for the purpose of applying this
title to an institution described in Subsection (1) that is organized as a
limited liability company:
(a)  a citation to Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation
Act, includes the equivalent citation to Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised
Limited Liability Company Act;
(b)  "articles of incorporation" includes a limited liability company's
articles of organization as that term is used in Section 48-2c-403;
(c)  "board of directors" includes one or more persons who have, with respect
to an institution described in Subsection (1), authority substantially similar
to that of a board of directors of a corporation;
(d)  "bylaws" includes a limited liability company's operating agreement as
that term is defined in Section 48-2c-102;
(e)  "corporation" includes a limited liability company organized under Title
48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act;
(f)  "director" includes any of the following of a limited liability company:
(i)  a manager;
(ii)  a director; or
(iii)  other person who has with respect to the institution described in
Subsection (1), authority substantially similar to that of a director of a
corporation;
(g)  "dividend" includes distributions made by a limited liability company
under Title 48, Chapter 2c, Part 10, Distributions;
(h)  "incorporator" includes the organizers of a limited liability company as
provided in Title 48, Chapter 2c, Part 4, Formation;
(i)  "officer" includes any of the following of an institution described in
Subsection (1):
(i)  an officer; or
(ii)  other person who has with respect to the institution described in
Subsection (1) authority substantially similar to that of an officer of a
corporation;
(j)  "security," "shares," or "stock" of a corporation includes:
(i)  a membership interest in a limited liability company as provided in Title
48, Chapter 2c, Part 7, Members; and
(ii)  any certificate or other evidence of an ownership interest in a limited
liability company; and
(k)  "stockholder" or "shareholder" includes an owner of an interest in an
institution described in Subsection (1) including a member as provided in
Title 48, Chapter 2c, Part 7, Members.
(7)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner shall make rules governing the form of a request for
approval filed under this section.
(8)  A depository institution organized under the laws of this state may not
be organized as or converted to a series of members, managers, or interests in
a limited liability company as provided in Section 48-2c-606.
